Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2331XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 478 Section 1. MEDICAID AND CHILDRENâS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM 1 COVERAGE ââ MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROVIDED IN SCHOOL-BASED 2 SETTINGS. 3 1. The department of health and human services shall 4 request approval of any Medicaid state plan amendment, or 5 other amendments necessary, from the centers for Medicare 6 and Medicaid services of the United States department of 7 health and human services (CMS) to provide covered Medicaid 8 and childrenâs health insurance program (CHIP) mental health 9 services in school-based settings regardless of formal mental 10 health diagnosis as provided under section 11003 of the federal 11 Bipartisan Safer Communities Act, Pub. L. No. 117-159, and in 12 accordance with the guidance published May 18, 2023, by CMS. 13 At a minimum, the department of health and human services shall 14 include as covered mental health services family, group, and 15 individual therapy; prevention and evaluation services; and 16 case management. The covered services shall be provided to all 17 children enrolled in Medicaid or CHIP whether or not a child 18 has an individualized education program or plan. 19 2. The department of health and human services shall 20 also utilize assistance provided through the technical 21 assistance center established by the United States department 22 of health and human services in cooperation with the United 23 States department of education, and shall collaborate with 24 local school districts in developing the Medicaid state plan 25 amendment, or other necessary amendments, and in implementing 26 the flexibilities and requirements for the school-based 27 services, especially in small, rural, and under-resourced 28 schools, to increase access to covered services while ensuring 29 fiscal and programmatic integrity. 30